Maryland, session 2026, SB0522.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
9–721.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0522*

SENATE BILL 522
(c) [If] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, IF a permanent
impairment involves a behavioral or mental disorder, a licensed psychologist, LICENSED
CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL, or qualified physician shall:
(1) perform an evaluation of only the mental or behavioral portion of the
permanent impairment; and
(2) report the evaluation to the Commission in accordance with the
regulations of the Commission.
(D) TO PERFORM AND REPORT AN EVALUATION UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF
THIS SECTION, A LICENSED CERTIFIED SOCIAL WORKER–CLINICAL MUST:
(1) MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR EVALUATION, DIAGNOSIS, AND
TREATMENT OF:
(I) BIOPSYCHOSOCIAL CONDITIONS;
(II) MENTAL AND EMOTIONAL CONDITIONS AND IMPAIRMENTS;
AND
(III) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH DISORDERS INCLUDING
SUBSTANCE–RELATED DISORDERS, ADDICTIVE DISORDERS, AND MENTAL
DISORDERS, AS THOSE TERMS ARE DEFINED IN § 7.5–101 OF
THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE;
(2) MEET THE REQUIREMENTS FOR REGISTRATION FOR A
REHABILITATION COUNSELOR OR A VOCATIONAL EVALUATOR ESTABLISHED UNDER
§ 9–6A–09 OF THIS TITLE;
(3) HAVE MET THE REQUIREMENTS DESCRIBED IN ITEMS (1) AND (2)
OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR A MINIMUM OF 2 YEARS FOLLOWING THE INITIAL
ISSUANCE OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S LICENSE; AND
(4) BE AN AUTHORIZED PROVIDER, AS DEFINED IN COMAR
14.09.08.01.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.